dict/pt_BR.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX m   ir      í-los-iam      air
SFX m   ir      í-los-iam      [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -los-iam       [qg]uir
SFX m   ir      í-me           air
SFX m   ir      í-me           [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -me            [qg]uir
SFX m   ir      í-te           air
SFX m   ir      í-te           [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -te            [qg]uir
SFX m   ir      í-lhe          air
SFX m   ir      í-lhe          [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -lhe           [qg]uir
SFX m   ir      í-lhes         air
SFX m   ir      í-lhes         [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -lhes          [qg]uir
SFX m   r       -me            ir
SFX m   r       -me            denegrir
SFX m   r       -me            gar
SFX m   r       -me            valer
SFX m   r       -nos           ir
SFX m   r       -nos           gar
SFX m   r       -nos           valer
SFX m   r       -lo            ir
SFX m   r       -o             gar
SFX m   r       -o             valer
SFX m   r       -los           ir
SFX m   r       -os            gar
SFX m   r       -os            valer
SFX m   r       -se            ir
SFX m   r       -se            gar
SFX m   r       -se            valer
SFX m   r       -te            ir
SFX m   r       -te            gar
SFX m   r       -te            valer
SFX m   r       -vos           ir
SFX m   r       -vos           gar
SFX m   r       -vos           valer
SFX m   r       a-a            ir
SFX m   r       a-as           ir
SFX m   r       á-la-á         gar
SFX m   r       á-la-á         iuvar
SFX m   r       á-la-emos      boiar
SFX m   r       á-la-emos      gar
SFX m   r       á-la-emos      iuvar
SFX m   r       á-las-á        boiar
SFX m   r       á-las-á        gar
SFX m   r       á-las-á        iuvar
SFX m   r       á-las-emos     boiar
SFX m   r       á-las-emos     gar
SFX m   r       á-las-emos     iuvar
SFX m   r       a-lhe          air
SFX m   r       a-lhe          denegrir
SFX m   r       a-lhe          gir
SFX m   r       a-lhe          guir
SFX m   r       a-lhe          oibir
SFX m   r       a-lhe          subir
SFX m   r       a-lhe          vestir
SFX m   r       a-lhes         air
SFX m   r       a-lhes         denegrir
SFX m   r       a-lhes         gir
SFX m   r       a-lhes         guir
SFX m   r       a-lhes         oibir
SFX m   r       a-lhes         subir
SFX m   r       a-lhes         vestir
SFX m   r       a-me           air
SFX m   r       a-me           denegrir
SFX m   r       a-me           gir
SFX m   r       a-me           guir
SFX m   r       a-me           oibir
SFX m   r       a-me           subir
SFX m   r       a-me           vestir
SFX m   r       a-nos          air
SFX m   r       a-nos          denegrir
SFX m   r       a-nos          gir
SFX m   r       a-nos          guir
SFX m   r       a-nos          oibir
SFX m   r       a-nos          subir
SFX m   r       a-nos          vestir
SFX m   r       a-o            air
SFX m   r       a-o            denegrir
SFX m   r       a-o            gir
SFX m   r       a-o            guir
SFX m   r       a-o            oibir
SFX m   r       a-o            subir
SFX m   r       a-o            vestir
SFX m   r       a-os           air
SFX m   r       a-os           denegrir
SFX m   r       a-os           gir
SFX m   r       a-os           guir
SFX m   r       a-os           oibir
SFX m   r       a-os           subir
SFX m   r       a-os           vestir
SFX m   r       a-se           air
SFX m   r       a-se           denegrir
SFX m   r       a-se           gir
SFX m   r       a-se           guir
SFX m   r       a-se           oibir
SFX m   r       a-se           subir
SFX m   r       a-se           vestir
SFX m   r       a-te           air
SFX m   r       a-te           denegrir
SFX m   r       a-te           gir
SFX m   r       a-te           guir
SFX m   r       a-te           oibir
SFX m   r       a-te           subir
SFX m   r       a-te           vestir
SFX m   r       a-vos          air
SFX m   r       a-vos          denegrir
SFX m   r       a-vos          gir
SFX m   r       a-vos          guir
SFX m   r       a-vos          oibir
SFX m   r       a-vos          subir
SFX m   r       a-vos          vestir
SFX m   r       am-lhe         air
SFX m   r       am-lhe         denegrir
SFX m   r       am-lhe         gir
SFX m   r       am-lhe         guir
SFX m   r       am-lhe         oibir
SFX m   r       am-lhe         subir
SFX m   r       am-lhe         vestir
SFX m   r       am-lhes        air
SFX m   r       am-lhes        denegrir
SFX m   r       am-lhes        gir
SFX m   r       am-lhes        guir
SFX m   r       am-lhes        oibir
SFX m   r       am-lhes        subir
SFX m   r       am-lhes        vestir
SFX m   r       am-me          air
SFX m   r       am-me          denegrir
SFX m   r       am-me          gir
SFX m   r       am-me          guir
SFX m   r       am-me          oibir
SFX m   r       am-me          subir
SFX m   r       am-me          vestir
SFX m   r       am-na          air
SFX m   r       am-na          denegrir
SFX m   r       am-na          gir
SFX m   r       am-na          guir
SFX m   r       am-na          oibir
SFX m   r       am-na          subir
SFX m   r       am-na          vestir
SFX m   r       am-nas         air
SFX m   r       am-nas         denegrir
SFX m   r       am-nas         gir
SFX m   r       am-nas         guir
SFX m   r       am-nas         oibir
SFX m   r       am-nas         subir
SFX m   r       am-nas         vestir
SFX m   r       am-no          air
SFX m   r       am-no          denegrir
SFX m   r       am-no          gir
SFX m   r       am-no          guir
SFX m   r       am-no          oibir
SFX m   r       am-no          subir
SFX m   r       am-no          vestir
SFX m   r       am-nos         air
SFX m   r       am-nos         denegrir
SFX m   r       am-nos         gir
SFX m   r       am-nos         guir
SFX m   r       am-nos         oibir
SFX m   r       am-nos         subir
SFX m   r       am-nos         vestir
SFX m   r       am-se          air
SFX m   r       am-se          denegrir
SFX m   r       am-se          gir
SFX m   r       am-se          guir
SFX m   r       am-se          oibir
SFX m   r       am-se          subir
SFX m   r       am-se          vestir
SFX m   r       am-te          air
SFX m   r       am-te          denegrir
SFX m   r       am-te          gir
SFX m   r       am-te          guir
SFX m   r       am-te          oibir
SFX m   r       am-te          subir
SFX m   r       am-te          vestir
SFX m   r       am-vos         air
SFX m   r       am-vos         denegrir
SFX m   r       am-vos         gir
SFX m   r       am-vos         guir
SFX m   r       am-vos         oibir
SFX m   r       am-vos         subir
SFX m   r       am-vos         vestir
SFX m   r       amo-nos        air
SFX m   r       amo-vos        air
SFX m   r       amos-lhe       air
SFX m   r       amos-lhes      air
SFX m   r       amos-te        air
SFX m   r       do-a           boiar
SFX m   r       do-a           denegrir
SFX m   r       do-a           gar
SFX m   r       do-a           gir
SFX m   r       do-a           guir
SFX m   r       do-a           iuvar
SFX m   r       do-a           oibir
SFX m   r       do-a           subir
SFX m   r       do-a           vestir
SFX m   r       do-as          boiar
SFX m   r       do-as          denegrir
SFX m   r       do-as          gar
SFX m   r       do-as          gir
SFX m   r       do-as          guir
SFX m   r       do-as          iuvar
SFX m   r       do-as          oibir
SFX m   r       do-as          subir
SFX m   r       do-as          vestir
SFX m   r       do-lhe         boiar
SFX m   r       do-lhe         denegrir
SFX m   r       do-lhe         gar
SFX m   r       do-lhe         gir
SFX m   r       do-lhe         guir
SFX m   r       do-lhe         iuvar
SFX m   r       do-lhe         oibir
SFX m   r       do-lhe         subir
SFX m   r       do-lhe         vestir
SFX m   r       do-lhes        boiar
SFX m   r       do-lhes        denegrir
