dict/pt_BR.dic
abgregar/cjLmY
ablegar/cjLmY
abodegar/cjLmY
abstrair/cjLMm
ad-rogar/cjLmMY
adengar/cjLmMY
adregar/cjLmMY
afagar/cjLmMYÂ
afligir/cjLmMÂË
agir/cjLmÀÍÑ
ajudengar/cjLmMY
aldeagar/cjLmMY
almecegar/cjLmMY
aluir/cjLm
amatungar/cjLmMY
amovir/cjm
apagar/cjLmMYÂ
arengar/cjLmY
arreigar/cjLmMYÂ
arrigar/cjLmMYÂ
atartarugar/cjLmMY
aturgar/cjLmMY
avancargar/cjLmMY
avir/cjLmMÀÂ
balangar/cjLmMY
bingar/cjLmMY
boiar/cjLmMYÂò
buir/cjLm
cafangar/cjLmMY
calemburgar/cjLmMY
capengar/cjLmMY
carregar/cjLMmYÀÂÃËÎú
catracegar/cjLmMY
centrifugar/cjLmMYà
chamegar/cjLmMYò
chegar/cjLmMYÀË
chumbregar/cjLmMY
circunfluir/cjLm
circunvolvir/cjLMm
coligir/cjLMmÀ
compurgar/cjLmY
condoer/cjLMm
conjungir/cjLMm
conter/cjLMm
contribuir/cjLm
corrugar/cjLmY
deflagar/cjLmMY
deligar/cjLmY
denegar/cjmNY
derregar/cjLmY
derruir/cjLm
desbragar/cjLmMY
desnalgar/cjLmMY
desraigar/cjLmMY
desvair/cjLm
detergir/cjLMm
dialogar/cjLmY
diminuir/cjLm
disjungir/cjLMm
ditongar/cjLmY
doer/cjLMm
efluir/cjLm
eluir/cjLm
embair/cjLMm
embarrigar/cjLmMYÂ
embingar/cjLmMY
embodegar/cjLmMY
emboligar/cjLmMY
embriagar/cjLmMYÂ
empegar/cjLmMYÂ
empesgar/cjLmMY
empostigar/cjLmMY
encalgar/cjLmMY
encangar/cjLmMYÂ
encarregar/cjLmMYÂ
endilgar/cjLmMY
endragar/cjLmMY
enfogar/cjLmY
engar/cjLmMY
engigar/cjLmMY
enjorgar/cjLmMY
enogar/cjLmMY
enrodrigar/cjLmMY
ensofregar/cjLmMY
entalingar/cjLmMY
entanguir/cjLm
entregar/cjLmY
entreter/bcjMm
enverrugar/cjLmMY
envisgar/cjLmMY
enxergar/cjLmMYÂ
enxugar/cjLmMY
erigir/cjLMmÀ
esbarregar/cjLmMY
esbodegar/cjLmY
esburgar/cjLmMY
escangar/cjLmMY
escorregar/cjLmMY
esfolegar/cjLmMY
esfregar/cjLmMY
esgar/cjLmMY
eslingar/cjLmMY
esmoer/cjLMm
esmurrengar/cjLmMY
espalhagar/cjLmY
esparregar/cjLmMY
espermegar/cjLmMY
espremegar/cjLmMY
estabougar/cjLmMY
estatuir/cjLm
estomegar/cjLmMY
estornegar/cjLmMY
estrafegar/cjLmMY
estrefegar/cjLmMY
estrigir/cjLMm
estrufegar/cjLmMY
esvair/cjLMm
evoluir/cjLm
excomungar/cjLmYÂ
exinguir/cjLm
expurgar/cjLmY
exsurgir/cjLMm
fadigar/cjLmMYÂò
fandingar/cjLmMY
fatigar/cjLmMY
fisgar/cjLmMY
folgar/cjLmMYÀÂ
formigar/cjLmMY
fossangar/cjLmMY
frigir/cjLmMÀò
frutegar/cjLmMY
fumegar/cjLmMYò
furungar/cjLmMY
fustigar/cjLmY
gemelgar/cjLmMY
gongar/cjLmMY
grongar/cjLmMY
heterocarregar/cjLmMY
ignifugar/cjLmY
imergir/cjLMmÀ
impingir/cjLMm
infligir/cjLMm
infringir/cjLMm
instruir/cjLmÂ
interligar/cjLmYÂ
intervir/cjLMm
investir/cjLMmÀÂÌÎ
irrogar/cjLmY
irruir/cm
jangar/cjLmMY
jugar/cm
jungir/cjLmMÂÄ
labregar/cjLmMYò
largar/cjLmYÀÂ
latingar/cjLmMY
legar/cjLmYÀÂÑò
lengar/cjLmMY
lingar/cjLmMYÀ
lobregar/cjLmMY
lorgar/cjLmMY
mal-empregar/cm
mangar/cjLmYÀÂò
mastigar/cjLmYÀ
melifluir/cm
mengar/cjLmMY
mingar/cjLmMY
moer/cjLMmÀ
molengar/cjLmMYò
monossubstituir/cm
morcegar/cjLmMYò
morsegar/cjLmMYò
mugangar/cjLmMY
mungir/cjLMm
nagar/cjLmMYò
negar/cjLmYÀÂÈò
ob-rogar/cjLmY
obrigar/cjLmYÀÂÃÑ
obter/bcjLmMÀ
ofegar/cjLmY
oigar/cjLmMY
outorgar/cjLmMYÃ
pangar/cjLmMY
pategar/cjLmMY
percingir/cjLMm
perigar/cjLmMY
perlongar/cjLmMY
persolvir/cjLMm
pespegar/cjLmMY
pigar/cjLmMY
pintalgar/cjLmMY
pitosgar/cjLmMY
polegar/cjLmMYÀò
possuir/cjLmÀÂò
pragar/cjLmMY
precluir/cjLm
presigar/cjLmMYò
profligar/cjLmY
prologar/cjLmMY
promulgar/cjLmMY
prosseguir/cjLMm
provir/cjLMm
puir/cjLm
quingar/cjLmMY
radiopregar/cjLmY
rangir/cjLMm
rasmolgar/cjLmMY
recluir/cjLm
redissolvir/cjLMm
refunfumegar/cjLmMY
reguingar/cjLmMYó
remugar/cjLmMY
repolgar/cjLmMY
resgalgar/cjLmMY
resmolgar/cjLmMY
respigar/cjLmMY
ressorvir/cjLMm
restringir/cjLMm
reter/bcjMm
retroagir/cjLMm
retrotrair/cjLm
roçagar/cjLmMY
rodrigar/cjLmMY
rugar/cjLmMYÂ
rusgar/cjLmMY
sair/cjLmMÀË
sanguessugar/cjLmY
segregar/cjLmMYÂ
semivivir/cjLMm
seringar/cjLmY
sobressair/cjLMm
sobrevir/cjLMm
sogar/cjLmMY
solvir/cjLMm
sopegar/cjLmMY
subjugar/cjLmMYÂ
sufragar/cjLmMY
sugar/cjLmMY
sungar/cjLmYó
talingar/cjLmMYÂ
tarugar/cjLmMYò
televir/cjm
tibungar/cjLmMY
tingir/cjLmMÀÂò
tossegar/cjLmMY
trafegar/cjLmMYò
trair/cjLmÀÈòÛ
trasfegar/cjLmMY
trejugar/cjLmMY
tresfolegar/cjLmMY
trissubstituir/cm
tuitar/cjLMmYÀÂÃ
turgir/cjLMmò
urgir/cjLMm
valer/cjLmMÂËì
verrugar/cjLmMYò
viuvar/cjLmMY
xumbregar/cjLmY
zungar/cjLmMY
